Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.110

Information about rights—Custody without court order—Written statement required—Contents.

If a child has been taken into custody by law enforcement pursuant to RCW 26.44.050, the law enforcement agency shall leave a written statement with a parent or in the residence of the parent if no parent is present. The statement shall give the reasons for the removal of the child from the home and the telephone number of the child protective services office in the parent's jurisdiction.

[ 1985 c 183 s 3.]